Utah statutes.
58-61-501.   Unlawful conduct.

As used in this chapter, "unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  practice of psychology unless licensed as a psychologist or certified psychology resident under this chapter or exempted from licensure under this title;

(2)  practice of mental health therapy by a licensed psychologist who has not acceptably documented to the division his completion of the supervised training in psychotherapy required under Subsection 58-61-304(1)(f); or

(3)  representing oneself as or using the title of psychologist, or certified psychology resident unless currently licensed under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 281, 2001 General Session

